Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-158
Interpreter; privilege applicable.

Whenever a deaf or hard of hearing person communicates through an interpreter under circumstances in which the communication would otherwise be privileged, the privilege shall apply to the interpreter as well.

Laws 1987, LB 376, § 9;

Laws 1997, LB 851, § 9.